Hawaii statutes.
[§346-43.5] Medical assistance frauds,
penalties. It is unlawful for any person to knowingly and wilfully make or
cause to be made to the medical assistance program any false statement or
representation of a material fact in any application for any benefit or payment
for furnishing services or supplies, or for the purpose of obtaining greater
compensation than that to which the person is legally entitled, or for the
purpose of obtaining authorization for furnishing services or supplies.
Violation of this section shall be a class C felony. The enforcement of
remedies provided under this section are not exclusive and shall not preclude
the use of any other criminal or civil remedy. [L 1980, c 210, §1]

Cross References

Medicaid fraud unit, see §28-91.

Case Notes

State has compelling interest in ensuring that medicaid
program is not being defrauded. 481 F. Supp. 1028 (1979).

Fatal variance between evidence proved and elements of the
offense charged in the indictment. 68 H. 343, 713 P.2d 432 (1986).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next